Louisiana, session 2026, HB1100.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
5 Section 1. R.S. 40:782 through 792 are hereby repealed in their entirety.
DIGEST
The digest printed below was prepared by House Legislative Services. It constitutes no part
of the legislative instrument. The keyword, one-liner, abstract, and digest do not constitute
part of the law or proof or indicia of legislative intent. [R.S. 1:13(B) and 24:177(E)]
HB 1100 Engrossed 2026 Regular Session McMakin
Abstract: Repeals requirements for enriching bread and flour sold in this state.
Present law requires bread and flour sold in this state to be enriched with vitamins in certain
amounts.
Present law requires enriched flour and bread to be properly labeled in accordance with state
and federal law.
Present law exempts certain flour and bread products and transactions from requirements of
present law including specific commercial uses, whole wheat products, toll milling, and
on-farm use.
Present law authorizes the La. Dept. of Health (LDH) to conduct inspections, collect
samples, and investigate facilities involved in flour and bread production and distribution.
Present law authorizes LDH to temporarily suspend enrichment requirements during
ingredient shortages and to reinstate them when the shortage ends.
Present law authorizes LDH to adopt, amend, and rescind rules and regulations necessary
to implement related to enriched flour.
Present law requires publication of notices, rules, and orders in newspapers across three
regions of the state and allows LDH to set the effective date.
Page 1 of 2

HLS 26RS-2717 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1100
Present law establishes penalties for violations, including fines, imprisonment, or both.
Proposed law repeals present law.
(Repeals R.S. 40:782-792)
Page 2 of 2